sk-SK: Konfigurácia zmenšeného modelu rotora: Koaxiálne rotory; Prekrývajúce sa rotory (synchropter); NOTAR; Jeden hlavný rotor a chvostový rotor; Tandemové rotory; Rotor s tryskami na koncoch listov; Iné
nb: Rotorkonfigurasjon for skalamodell: Koaksiale rotorer; Kryssende rotorer (synkropter); NOTAR; Enkel hovedrotor og halerotor; Tandemrotorer; Tip-jet-rotor; Annet
sl-SI: Konfiguracija rotorja makete: Koaksialni rotorji; Prekrivajoči se rotorji (sinhropter); NOTAR; En glavni rotor in repni rotor; Tandemski rotorji; Rotor na reaktivni pogon na konicah krakov; Drugo
fi: Pienoismallin roottorin kokoonpano: Koaksiaaliroottorit; Limittäiset roottorit (synkropteri); NOTAR; Yksi pääroottori ja pyrstöroottori; Peräkkäisroottorit; Kärkisuutinroottori; Muu
pl: Konfiguracja wirników modelu w skali: Wirniki współosiowe; Wirniki krzyżowe (synchropter); NOTAR; Pojedynczy wirnik główny + wirnik ogonowy; Wirniki w układzie tandem; Wirnik z napędem odrzutowym na końcach łopat; Inna
ro-RO: Configurația rotorului modelului la scară: Rotoare coaxiale; Rotoare cu angrenare reciprocă (sincropter); NOTAR; Un singur rotor principal + rotor anticuplu; Rotoare în tandem; Rotor tip-jet; Altele
vi: Cấu hình rôto mô hình tỷ lệ: Rotor đồng trục; Rotor đan chéo (synchropter); NOTAR; Một rotor chính và rotor đuôi; Rotor trước sau; Rotor phản lực cánh quạt; Khác
lt-LT: Mastelinio modelio rotoriaus konfigūracija: Bendraašiai sraigtai; Susikertantys sraigtai (sinkropteris); NOTAR; Vienas pagrindinis rotorius + uodegos rotorius; Tandeminiai rotoriai; Rotorius su reaktyviniais antgaliais; Kita
ru: Конфигурация ротора масштабной модели: Соосные винты; Перекрещивающиеся винты (синхроптер); NOTAR; Один несущий винт + рулевой винт; Тандемные винты; Винт с реактивным приводом; Другое
es: Configuración del rotor del modelo a escala: Rotores coaxiales; Rotores entrelazados (sincróptero); NOTAR; Un solo rotor principal y rotor de cola; Rotores en tándem; Rotor tip-jet; Otro
el: Τύπος διάταξης ρότορα στο μοντέλο κλίμακας: Ομοαξονικοί ρότορες; Συμπλεκόμενοι ρότορες (synchropter); NOTAR; Ένας κύριος ρότορας + ουραίος ρότορας; Διαδοχικοί ρότορες; Ρότορας tip-jet; Άλλο
tr: Ölçekli model rotor konfigürasyonu: Eş eksenli rotorlar; Kesişen rotorlar (senkropter); NOTAR; Tek ana rotor + kuyruk rotoru; Tandem rotorlar; Uçtan jetli rotor; Diğer
hu: Méretarányos makett rotor-konfigurációja: Koaxiális rotorok; Egymásba forgó rotorok (szinkropter); NOTAR; Egy főrotor + farokrotor; Tandem rotorok; Tip-jet rotor; Egyéb
nl: Schaalmodel rotorconfiguratie: Coaxiale rotors; In elkaar grijpende rotors (synchropter); NOTAR; Enkele hoofdrotor en staartrotor; Tandemrotors; Tipjet-rotor; Overig
th: รูปแบบใบพัดของแบบจำลองขนาดเล็ก: ใบพัดร่วมแกน; ใบพัดขัดกัน (ซินครอปเตอร์); NOTAR; ใบพัดหลักเดี่ยว + ใบพัดหาง; ใบพัดเรียงตามยาว; ใบพัดแบบทิปเจ็ต; อื่นๆ
ko: 축척 모델 로터 구성: 동축 반전 로터; 교차 반전 로터(싱크롭터); 노타(NOTAR); 단일 메인 로터 및 테일 로터; 탠덤 로터; 팁 제트 로터; 기타
sv: Skalmodellens rotorkonfiguration: Koaxialrotorer; Överlappande rotorer (synkropter); NOTAR; Enkel huvudrotor + stjärtrotor; Tandemrotorer; Tip-jet-rotor; Övrigt
it: Configurazione del rotore in scala: Rotori coassiali; Rotori incrociati (sincrottero); NOTAR; Rotore principale singolo + rotore di coda; Rotori in tandem; Rotore a getto in punta; Altro
fr: Configuration du rotor de la maquette: Rotors coaxiaux; Rotors engrenants (synchroptère); NOTAR; Rotor principal unique + rotor de queue; Rotors en tandem; Rotor à éjection en bout de pale; Autre
de: Rotorkonfiguration des Modellbausatzes: Koaxialrotoren; Ineinandergreifende Rotoren (Flettner-Doppelrotor); NOTAR; Hauptrotor + Heckrotor; Tandemrotoren; Blattspitzenantrieb; Sonstige
zh-TW: 比例模型旋翼配置: 同軸旋翼; 交錯式旋翼; NOTAR; 單主旋翼 + 尾旋翼; 縱列式旋翼; 葉尖噴射旋翼; 其他
en: Scale model rotor configuration: Coaxial rotors; Intermeshing rotors (synchropter); NOTAR; Single main rotor + tail rotor; Tandem rotors; Tip-jet rotor; Other
pt-BR: Modelo em escala configuração do rotor: Rotores coaxiais; Rotores entrecruzados (sincróptero); NOTAR; Rotor principal único + rotor de cauda; Rotores em tandem; Rotor tip-jet; Outros
zh-CN: 比例模型旋翼配置: 共轴双旋翼; 交叉双旋翼; 无尾桨 (NOTAR); 单主旋翼 + 尾桨; 纵列双旋翼; 桨尖喷气旋翼; 其他
hr-HR: Konfiguracija rotora makete u mjerilu: Koaksijalni rotori; Isprepleteni rotori (sinkropter); NOTAR; Jedan glavni rotor + stražnji rotor; Tandemski rotori; Rotor s mlaznicama na vrhovima; Ostalo
pt-PT: Configuração do rotor do modelo em escala: Rotores coaxiais; Rotores engrenados (sincróptero); NOTAR; Rotor principal único + rotor de cauda; Rotores em tandem; Rotor com jato nas pontas; Outro
bg-BG: Конфигурация на ротора на умален модел: Коаксиални ротори; Преплитащи се ротори (синхроптер); NOTAR; Един основен ротор + опашен ротор; Тандемни ротори; Ротор с реактивни дюзи; Други
da: Skalamodels rotorkonfiguration: Koaksiale rotorer; Fletrotorer (synchropter); NOTAR; Enkelt hovedrotor + halerotor; Tandemrotorer; Tip-jet-rotor; Andet
ja: スケールモデルローター構成: 同軸反転ローター; 交差反転ローター (シンクロプター); NOTAR; シングルメインローター + テールローター; タンデムローター; チップジェットローター; その他
cs: Konfigurace rotoru modelu v měřítku: Koaxiální rotory; Křížící se rotory (synchropter); NOTAR; Jeden hlavní rotor + ocasní rotor; Tandemové rotory; Tip-jet rotor; Jiné